District of Columbia statutes.
8-1017.01

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 18a
as added Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 804, 42 DCR 3684
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3417.1.
For temporary addition of section, see § 504 of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 804 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).